basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX Z1 Y 134
SFX Z1   a           i          [aeiouyžščřj]a
SFX Z1   a           i          [^srn]ca
SFX Z1   ca          ky         [srn]ca
SFX Z1   ďa          di         ďa
SFX Z1   ňa          ni         ňa
SFX Z1   ťa          ti         ťa
SFX Z1   a           y          [^aeiouyžščřcjďťň]a
SFX Z1   a           ě          [bdfmnptvw]a
SFX Z1   ďa          dě         ďa
SFX Z1   ňa          ně         ňa
SFX Z1   ťa          tě         ťa
SFX Z1   ga          ze         ga
SFX Z1   cha         še         cha
SFX Z1   ha          ze         [^c]ha
SFX Z1   ka          ce         ka
SFX Z1   ra          ře         [^r]ra
SFX Z1   rra         ře         rra
SFX Z1   a           e          [^bdfmnptvwďťňghkr]a
SFX Z1   a           u          a
SFX Z1   a           o          a
SFX Z1   a           ou         a
SFX Z1   a           y          ea
SFX Z1   a           í          [aeiouy]a
SFX Z1   a           ám         a
SFX Z1   a           ách        a
SFX Z1   0           mi         a
SFX Z1   y           ám         [^a]y
SFX Z1   y           ách        [^a]y
SFX Z1   y           ami        [^a]y
SFX Z1   0           e          ay
SFX Z1   0           i          ay
SFX Z1   0           í          ay
SFX Z1   0           ím         ay
SFX Z1   0           ích        ay
SFX Z1   0           emi        ay
SFX Z1   s           da         s
SFX Z1   s           dy         s
SFX Z1   s           dě         s
SFX Z1   s           du         s
SFX Z1   s           do         s
SFX Z1   s           dou        s
SFX Z1   s           dám        s
SFX Z1   s           dách       s
SFX Z1   s           dami       s
SFX Z1   e           i          [^g]e
SFX Z1   e           í          [^g]e
SFX Z1   e           ím         [^g]e
SFX Z1   e           ích        [^g]e
SFX Z1   0           mi         [^g]e
SFX Z1   ě           i          ě
SFX Z1   ě           í          ě
SFX Z1   ě           ím         ě
SFX Z1   ě           ích        ě
SFX Z1   0           mi         ě
SFX Z1   ge          ži         dge
SFX Z1   ge          ží         dge
SFX Z1   ge          žím        dge
SFX Z1   ge          žích       dge
SFX Z1   ge          žemi       dge
SFX Z1   eň          ně         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          ni         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          ní         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          ním        [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          ních       [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          němi       [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           ně         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           ni         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           ní         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           ním        [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           ních       [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   ň           němi       [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z1   eň          ně         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   eň          ni         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   eň          ní         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   eň          ním        [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   eň          ních       [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   eň          němi       [^lřs]eň
SFX Z1   ň           ně         [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ň           ni         [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ň           ní         [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ň           ním        [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ň           ních       [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ň           němi       [lř]eň
SFX Z1   ev          ve         ev
SFX Z1   ev          vi         ev
SFX Z1   ev          ví         ev
SFX Z1   ev          vím        ev
SFX Z1   ev          vích       ev
SFX Z1   ev          vemi       ev
SFX Z1   ec          ce         [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   ec          ci         [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   ec          cí         [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   ec          cím        [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   ec          cích       [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   ec          cemi       [^lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           e          [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           i          [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           í          [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           ím         [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           ích        [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           emi        [lp]ec
SFX Z1   0           e          [jlptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           i          [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           í          [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           ím         [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           ích        [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           emi        [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z1   0           ě          em
SFX Z1   0           ěmi        em
SFX Z1   0           e          [^e][cmv]
SFX Z1   0           i          [^e][cv]
SFX Z1   0           í          [^e][cv]
SFX Z1   0           ím         [^e][cv]
SFX Z1   0           ích        [^e][cv]
SFX Z1   0           emi        [^e][cv]
SFX Z1   ň           ně         [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ň           ni         [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ň           ní         [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ň           ním        [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ň           ních       [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ň           němi       [^e]ň
SFX Z1   ť           tě         ť
SFX Z1   ť           ti         ť
SFX Z1   ť           tí         ť
SFX Z1   ť           tím        ť
SFX Z1   ť           tích       ť
SFX Z1   ť           těmi       ť
SFX Z1   ď           dě         ď
SFX Z1   ď           di         ď
SFX Z1   ď           dí         ď
SFX Z1   ď           dím        ď
SFX Z1   ď           dích       ď
SFX Z1   ď           děmi       ď
SFX Z1   a           y          a
