basic-cs.dic
absurdita/Z1Q1
adorace/Z1
aerolinie/Z1
agentura/Z1Q1
agrobanka/Z1Q1
akciovka/Z1Q1
aktivita/Z1Q1
akustika/Z1Q1
alena/Z1Q1
almara/Z1Q1
alžběta/Z1Q1
amerikanizace/Z1
anabáze/Z1
anatomie/Z1
anekdota/Z1Q1
angola/Z1Q1
anoda/Z1Q1
antilopa/Z1Q1
antuka/Z1Q1
apokalypsa/Z1Q1
architektka/Z1Q1
aritmetika/Z1Q1
arogance/Z1
asfaltka/Z1Q1
asonance/Z1
atestace/Z1
atraktivita/Z1Q1
aura/Z1Q1
autocenzura/Z1Q1
autonomie/Z1
averze/Z1
bahamy/Z1Q1
banda/Z1Q1
barcelona/Z1Q1
barva/Z1
batika/Z1Q1
bašta/Z1Q1
bedýnka/Z1Q1
berla/Z1Q1
bestie/Z1
bible/Z1
biologie/Z1
bižutérie/Z1
bludička/Z1Q1
bohorodička/Z1Q1
bolívie/Z1
borovice/Z1Q1
botka/Z1Q1
božena/Z1Q1
brankářka/Z1Q1
briga/Z1Q1
broskev/Z1
brva/Z1Q1
brňanka/Z1Q1
bulharka/Z1Q1
bučina/Z1Q1
bystrouška/Z1Q1
báj/Z1
báň/Z1
běloruska/Z1Q1
břízka/Z1Q1
celebrita/Z1Q1
cenovka/Z1Q1
cesta/Z1Q1N1
charita/Z1Q1
chemikálie/Z1
chlustina/P1V1Z1Q1XD
cholera/Z1Q1
choutka/Z1Q1
chudina/Z1Q1
chvíle/Z1
cibulka/Z1Q1
cimra/Z1Q1
clona/Z1Q1
cvičitelka/Z1Q1
cícha/Z1Q1
daniela/Z1Q1
datle/Z1
dedukce/Z1
deka/Z1Q1
delta/Z1Q1
demokracie/Z1
deportace/Z1
desetiminutovka/Z1Q1
desítka/Z1Q1
deviza/Z1Q1
dečka/Z1Q1
dialýza/Z1Q1
dikce/Z1
direktiva/Z1Q1
diskotéka/Z1Q1
dispozice/Z1Q1
dividenda/Z1Q1
dlaždice/Z1Q1
docentka/Z1Q1
doktorka/Z1Q1
domluva/Z1Q1
dora/P1V1Z1Q1XD
doubravka/Z1Q1
dramaturgie/Z1
drogerie/Z1
drť/Z1I1
dubina/Z1Q1
dutina/Z1Q1
dvojhvězda/Z1Q1
dyje/Z1
dáša/Z1Q1
dýha/Z1Q1
děkanka/Z1Q1
děvečka/Z1Q1
dřina/Z1Q1
editace/Z1
elegie/Z1
elektrotechnika/Z1Q1
elvíra/Z1Q1
emoce/Z1
energetika/Z1Q1
epilepsie/Z1
erotika/Z1Q1
eskapáda/Z1Q1
etiopie/Z1
eutanazie/Z1
evoluce/Z1
existence/Z1N1
expozice/Z1Q1
fabulace/Z1
fanfára/Z1Q1
fascinace/Z1
federace/Z1
ferona/Z1Q1
figurína/Z1Q1
filozofie/Z1
flandry/Z1Q1
flotila/Z1Q1
fontána/Z1Q1
fortuna/Z1Q1
fotokopie/Z1
franca/Z1Q1
freska/Z1Q1
futurum/M1Q1Z1
fólie/Z1
galie/Z1
garsoniéra/Z1Q1
generalizace/Z1
geologie/Z1
gilotina/Z1Q1
glukóza/Z1Q1
gramatika/Z1Q1
grácie/Z1
gymnastka/Z1Q1
halena/Z1Q1
hanoj/Z1
havárie/Z1
helma/Z1Q1
herka/Z1Q1
historička/Z1Q1
hlaveň/Z1
hláska/Z1Q1
hniloba/Z1Q1
holeň/Z1
holínka/Z1Q1
honitba/Z1Q1
hospoda/Z1Q1
hostitelka/Z1Q1
housenka/Z1Q1
hraběnka/Z1Q1
hrdinka/Z1Q1
hrstka/Z1Q1
hrčka/Z1Q1
humanizace/Z1
hvězdice/Z1Q1
hygienička/Z1Q1
hádanka/Z1Q1
hříčka/Z1Q1
ideologie/Z1
iluminace/Z1
implantace/Z1
indiana/Z1Q1
indočína/Z1Q1
informatika/Z1Q1
inkarnace/Z1
instalace/Z1
integrita/Z1Q1
internace/Z1
intervence/Z1
invaze/Z1
inzultace/Z1
italština/Z1Q1
izrael/S1Z1
jamka/Z1Q1
jatky/Z1Q1
jednička/Z1Q1
jeptiška/Z1Q1
jihočeška/Z1Q1
jistina/Z1Q1
jiřina/Z1Q1
jota/Z1Q1
julka/Z1Q1
jáma/Z1
jíška/Z1Q1
kachna/Z1Q1
kala/Z1Q1
kalkulace/Z1
kamenina/Z1Q1
kamčatka/Z1Q1
kanonáda/Z1Q1
kapilára/Z1Q1
kapka/Z1Q1
kapsle/Z1
kariéra/Z1Q1
karotka/Z1Q1
kaskáda/Z1Q1
katedra/Z1Q1
kauce/Z1
kazaň/Z1
kdyně/Z1
kiruna/Z1Q1
klauzule/Z1
klientela/Z1Q1
klokočka/P1V1Z1Q1XD
klíněnka/Z1Q1
knížka/Z1Q1
kobylka/Z1Q1
koksovna/Z1Q1
kolektivizace/Z1
kolona/Z1Q1
kombinace/Z1
komise/Z1
kompetence/Z1
komunikace/Z1
kondice/Z1Q1
konfiskace/Z1
konotace/Z1
konstrukce/Z1
kontrašpionáž/Z1
konvergence/Z1
konzervatoř/Z1
končetina/Z1Q1
kopačka/Z1Q1
korba/Z1Q1
korouhev/Z1
kosa/Z1Q1
kostička/Z1Q1
kotrba/Z1Q1
koza/Z1Q1
košilka/Z1Q1
krajinka/Z1Q1
krasobruslařka/Z1Q1
kresba/Z1Q1
kristýna/Z1Q1
krovka/Z1Q1
krypta/Z1Q1
kráska/Z1Q1
kuběnka/Z1Q1
kukla/Z1Q1
kultivace/Z1
kurie/Z1
kuše/Z1
kvasnička/Z1Q1
květoslava/Z1Q1
kámasútra/Z1Q1
káča/Z1Q1
kýta/Z1Q1
křída/Z1Q1
kůže/Z1
lahev/Z1
lampa/Z1Q1
lastura/Z1Q1
lavička/Z1Q1
lednice/Z1Q1
legislativa/Z1Q1
lenka/Z1Q1
letka/Z1Q1
leč/Z1
libeň/Z1
libérie/Z1
likvidace/Z1
linda/P1V1Z1Q1XD
lisovna/Z1Q1
litografie/Z1
ljuba/Z1Q1
logistika/Z1Q1
losiny/Z1Q1
louč/Z1
lublaň/Z1
lukostřelba/Z1Q1
lužice/S1Z1Q1
láhev/Z1
lékárnička/Z1Q1
lípa/Z1
lžička/Z1Q1
magda/P1V1Z1Q1XD
mahulena/Z1Q1
makovice/Z1Q1
malvazinka/Z1Q1
mandarinka/Z1Q1
manipulace/Z1
manžeta/Z1Q1
marina/Z1Q1
marmeláda/Z1Q1
masna/Z1Q1
matička/Z1Q1
maxima/Z1Q1
mašinerie/Z1
mechanika/Z1Q1
medvědice/Z1Q1
membrána/Z1Q1
meta/Z1Q1
metla/Z1Q1
mez/Z1
migrace/Z1
milka/Z1Q1
mincovna/Z1Q1
minisukně/Z1
miska/Z1Q1
mlhovina/Z1Q1
mobilita/Z1Q1
modla/Z1Q1
mokřina/Z1Q1
monokultura/Z1Q1
morfologie/Z1
motyčka/Z1Q1
mraznička/Z1Q1
mrákota/Z1Q1
muzika/Z1Q1
mytologie/Z1
márnice/Z1Q1
mísa/Z1Q1
múza/Z1Q1
mšice/Z1Q1
nadvláda/Z1Q1
nahota/Z1Q1
narkomafie/Z1
natálie/Z1
necky/Z1Q1
neplecha/Z1Q1
neteř/Z1
nevěra/Z1Q1
nicka/Z1Q1
nina/Z1Q1
noclehárna/Z1Q1
normalita/Z1Q1N1
novela/Z1Q1
novota/Z1Q1
nudlička/Z1Q1
nádrž/Z1
nálada/Z1Q1
náměšť/Z1
nástraha/Z1Q1
návštěvnice/Z1Q1
něva/Z1Q1
obec/Z1
objektivita/Z1Q1
obluda/Z1Q1
obroda/Z1Q1
obstrukce/Z1
obživa/Z1Q1
ochutnávka/Z1Q1
odměna/Z1Q1
odveta/Z1Q1
ohrada/Z1Q1
okurka/Z1Q1
olomouc/Z1
omluva/Z1Q1
operace/Z1
opora/Z1Q1
opěra/Z1Q1
organizátorka/Z1Q1
osada/Z1Q1
osmiveslice/Z1Q1
ostruha/Z1Q1
otrokyně/Z1Q1
ovečka/Z1Q1
ošetřovatelka/Z1Q1
palačinka/Z1Q1
paluba/Z1Q1
panenka/Z1Q1
paprika/Z1Q1
parcela/Z1Q1
partie/Z1
paska/Z1Q1
pata/Z1Q1
patronace/Z1
paříž/Z1
pekárna/Z1Q1
perestrojka/Z1Q1
peripetie/Z1
persona/Z1Q1
petarda/Z1Q1
petržel/Z1
pilka/Z1Q1
pizzerie/Z1
plavky/Z1Q1
plocha/Z1Q1
plánička/Z1Q1
pochůzka/Z1Q1
podrážka/Z1Q1
pohroma/Z1Q1
polanka/Z1Q1
polka/Z1Q1
pomlázka/Z1Q1
popularita/Z1Q1
porážka/Z1Q1
potrava/Z1Q1
povolenka/Z1Q1
pracka/Z1Q1
prdel/Z1
prezidentka/Z1Q1
producentka/Z1Q1
projížďka/Z1Q1
prosba/Z1Q1
protéza/Z1Q1
pryž/Z1
průvodkyně/Z1Q1
pumovnice/Z1Q1
pánev/Z1
píle/Z1
píď/Z1
pře/Z1
předzahrádka/Z1Q1
přesila/Z1Q1
přilba/Z1Q1
příruba/Z1Q1
pšenička/Z1Q1
radiokomunikace/Z1
ranka/Z1Q1
recenze/Z1
reflexe/Z1
rekreace/Z1
reorganizace/Z1
restrukturalizace/Z1
rešerše/Z1
roleta/Z1Q1
rotunda/Z1Q1
rozjížďka/Z1Q1
rošáda/Z1Q1
ruska/Z1Q1
rytmika/Z1Q1
sabina/Z1Q1
samoobsluha/Z1Q1
sauna/Z1Q1
schránka/Z1Q1
sebereflexe/Z1
sekera/Z1Q1
senzibilita/Z1Q1
seč/Z1
siločára/Z1Q1
skartace/Z1
sklárna/Z1Q1
skvrnka/Z1Q1
sleva/Z1Q1
slovakofarma/Z1Q1
slávie/Z1
smrčka/Z1Q1
snídaně/Z1
sodovkárna/Z1Q1
souhra/Z1Q1
spalničky/Z1Q1
spodina/Z1Q1
spora/Z1Q1
spíž/Z1
stanovy/Z1Q1
stokoruna/Z1Q1
stravenka/Z1Q1
strážnice/Z1Q1
stylistika/Z1Q1
střela/Z1Q1
subsidiarita/Z1Q1
sutina/Z1Q1
svita/Z1Q1
světnice/Z1Q1
syntéza/Z1Q1
sólistka/Z1Q1
tanečnice/Z1Q1
taškařice/Z1Q1
tenistka/Z1Q1
teta/Z1Q1I1
tisícikoruna/Z1Q1
tobolka/Z1Q1
toyota/Z1Q1
transplantace/Z1
trikolóra/Z1Q1
troubky/Z1Q1
tuba/Z1Q1
tvárnice/Z1Q1
tóra/Z1Q1
třtina/Z1Q1
ukolébavka/Z1Q1
univerzita/Z1Q1
uzlina/Z1Q1
vanda/P1V1Z1Q1XD
vdova/Z1Q1
venda/P1V1Z1Q1XD
veselohra/Z1Q1
videohra/Z1Q1
vinoř/Z1
vizualizace/Z1
vláda/Z1Q1
volta/P1V1Z1Q1XD
vrtačka/Z1Q1
vykládka/Z1Q1
vzpěra/Z1Q1
vážka/Z1Q1
výhra/Z1Q1
výroba/Z1Q1
výtvarnice/Z1Q1
včelka/Z1Q1
věžička/Z1Q1
zambie/Z1
zdeňka/Z1Q1
zimnice/Z1Q1
zmínka/Z1Q1
zrada/Z1Q1
záchrana/Z1Q1
záložna/Z1Q1
zásoba/Z1Q1
závora/Z1Q1
óda/Z1Q1
úměra/Z1Q1
útrapa/Z1Q1
čechy/Z1Q1
čeština/Z1Q1
čtenářka/Z1Q1
částečka/Z1Q1
ředitelka/Z1Q1
římsa/Z1Q1
šavle/Z1
škatule/K1Z1
šlehačka/Z1Q1
štika/Z1Q1
švanda/Z1Q1
žalobkyně/Z1Q1
žeň/Z1
žofie/Z1
žízeň/Z1
váha/XAZ1
miliarda/Z1Q1
